test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-minema_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Verbs - minema: # Verb 'to go' - full paradigm

# Isikulised olevikuvormid # Personal present forms

     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: lähen
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: lähed
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: läheb
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: [läheme, lähme]
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: [lähete, lähte]
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: [lähevad, lähvad]
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: lähe

     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: läheksin
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: läheksid
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: läheks
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: läheksime
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: läheksite
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: läheksid

     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: mine
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: mingu
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: mingem
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: minge

     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Quot: minevat

# Isikulised minevikuvormid # Personal past forms

     minema+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Sg1+Aff: läksin
     minema+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Sg2+Aff: läksid
     minema+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Sg3+Aff: läks
     minema+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Pl1+Aff: läksime
     minema+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Pl2+Aff: läksite
     minema+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Pl3+Aff: läksid
     minema+V+Pers+Past+Ind+Neg: läinud

     minema+V+Pers+Past+Cond+Sg1+Aff: läinuksin
     minema+V+Pers+Past+Cond+Sg2+Aff: läinuksid
     minema+V+Pers+Past+Cond: läinuks
     minema+V+Pers+Past+Cond+Pl1+Aff: läinuksime
     minema+V+Pers+Past+Cond+Pl2+Aff: läinuksite
     minema+V+Pers+Past+Cond+Pl3+Aff: läinuksid

     minema+V+Pers+Past+Imprt: läinud

     minema+V+Pers+Past+Quot: läinuvat

# Isikulised käändelised vormid # Personal infinite forms

     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Prc: minev
     minema+V+Pers+Past+Prc: läinud

     minema+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: minema
     minema+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: minemas
     minema+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: minemast
     minema+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: minemaks
     minema+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: minemata

# Umbisikuline olevik # Impersonal present forms

     minema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: minnakse
     minema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: minda
     minema+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: mindaks
     minema+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: mindagu
     minema+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: mindavat

# Umbisikuline minevik # Impersonal past forms

     minema+V+Impers+Past+Ind+Aff: mindi
     minema+V+Impers+Past+Ind+Neg: mindud

     minema+V+Impers+Past+Cond: minduks

# Umbisikulised käändelised vormid # Impersonal infinite forms

     minema+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: mindav
     minema+V+Impers+Past+Prc: mindud

     minema+V+Impers+Sup: mindama

# Tegumoe kategooriata käändelised vormid # Infinite forms without voice category

     minema+V+Inf: minna
     minema+V+Ger: minnes

# The verb forms list should be complete now
